New Jersey, session 222, A4384.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the State Treasurer shall debit from a public research universitys State operating aid an amount equal to the costs incurred by the institution in implementing any agreements reached with students protesting the Israel-Hamas conflict that began on October 7, 2023, including, but not limited to, costs associated with: (1)  the institutions acceptance of, and any institutional aid provided for, displaced Gazan students; (2)  establishing an Arab Cultural Center; (3)  establishing an educational and collaborative partnership with Birzeit University; (4)  hiring senior administrators with cultural competency and knowledge about Arabs, Palestinians, Muslims, anti-Palestinian racism, and Islamophobia; (5)  hiring additional professors specializing in Palestine studies and Middle East studies; (6)  establishing a center for Palestinian studies and the departmentalization of Middle East studies; (7)  displaying the flags of a country or territory that is controlled by a foreign terrorist organization as designated by the United States Secretary of State pursuant to 8 U.S.C. s.1189; and (8)  providing amnesty to students, student groups, faculty, and staff involved in anti-Semitic protests on the campus of the institution. b.  As used in this section, public research university means the same as that term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-3). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.